Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 14 DENVER METROPOLITAN MAJOR LEAGUE BASEBALL STADIUM DISTRICT
32-14-117. Issuance of special obligation bonds.

Upon the approval of the registered electors pursuant to the provisions of section 32-14-105, the district may borrow money in anticipation of the revenues generated from the operation of a stadium and sales tax revenues of the district and may issue special obligation bonds to evidence the amount so borrowed. If the district issues special obligation bonds after such approval by the registered electors but prior to the granting of a major league baseball franchise by major league baseball to be located within the district, the proceeds of such special obligation bonds shall not be used to pay for any expenses incurred by the district until such time as major league baseball grants a major league baseball franchise to be located within the district. Special obligation bonds or other obligations payable in whole or in part from sales tax revenues or net operating revenues of the district or from moneys or assets of the district held in escrow may be issued or incurred without an election, in anticipation of such sales tax revenues or net operating revenues or such moneys or assets held in escrow.

Special obligation bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall satisfy the terms, conditions, and requirements as set forth in any resolution adopted by the board authorizing the issuance of such special obligation bonds or in any trust indenture entered into between the board and any commercial bank or trust company having full trust powers which are not inconsistent with the provisions of this article. Such terms, conditions, and requirements may include, but are not limited to, the following:

The execution and delivery of such special obligation bonds by the district and the times of such execution and delivery;

The form and denominations of such special obligation bonds, including the terms and maturities;

Whether such special obligation bonds are subject to optional or mandatory redemption prior to maturity with or without a premium;

Whether such special obligation bonds are in fully registered form or bearer form registrable as to principal or interest, or both;

Whether such special obligation bonds may bear conversion privileges and, if so, such conversion privileges;

Whether such special obligation bonds are payable in installments and, if so, the times of such installment payments; however, the period of time during which such payments may be made shall not exceed twenty years from the date of issuance;

The place or places, within or without the state, at which such special obligation bonds may be paid;

The interest rate or rates which such special obligation bonds bear per annum and which may be fixed or may vary according to index, procedure, formula, or such other method as determined by the district or its agents, without regard to any interest rate limitation specified by the laws of this state;

Whether such special obligation bonds are subject to purchase at the option of the holder or the district;

The manner of evidencing such special obligation bonds;

Whether such special obligations may be executed by the officers of the district, including the use of one or more facsimile signatures so long as at least one manual signature of an officer of the district, or of any agent authenticating the same, appears on the special obligations bonds; and

Whether such special obligation bonds are in the form of coupon bonds which have attached interest coupons bearing a manual or facsimile signature of an officer of the district.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1336, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1522, § 10, effective April 16.

32-14-118. Pledge of sales tax revenues and net operating revenues.

The payment of special obligation bonds may be secured by the specific pledge of sales tax revenues of the district, operating revenues of the district, or moneys or assets of the district held in escrow as the board, in its discretion, may determine. Operating revenues, sales tax revenues, or moneys or assets held in escrow pledged for the payment of any special obligation bonds, as received by the district, shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge, without any physical delivery thereof, any filing, or further act, and the lien of such pledge and the obligation to perform the contractual provisions made in the authorizing resolution or other instrument relating thereto shall have priority over all other obligations and liabilities of the district, except as may be otherwise provided in this article or in such resolution or instrument, and subject to any prior pledges and liens previously created. The lien of such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all persons having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the district, regardless of whether such persons have notice thereof.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1337, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1523, § 11, effective April 16.

32-14-119. Payment, recital, and securities.

Special obligation bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this article and constituting special obligations shall recite in substance that the obligations and the interest thereon are payable solely from operating revenues of the district, sales tax revenues of the district, or moneys or assets of the district held in escrow, as the case may be, pledged to the payment thereof.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1337, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1524, § 12, effective April 16.

32-14-120. Incontestable recital in securities.

Any authorizing resolution, or other instrument relating thereto pursuant to the provisions of this article, may provide that each security therein designated shall recite that it is issued pursuant to the authority of this article. Such recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all of the provisions of this article, and all securities issued containing such recital shall be incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1337, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-121. Limitation upon payment.

The payment of special obligation bonds shall not be secured by any encumbrance, mortgage, or other pledge of property of the district, other than operating revenues, sales tax revenues, or moneys or assets held in escrow. No property of the district, subject to this exception, shall be liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of the special obligation bonds.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1337, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1524, § 13, effective April 16.

32-14-122. Negotiability.

Subject to the payment provisions specifically provided in this article, any special obligation bonds shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all the purposes of article 8 of title 4, C.R.S., except as the board may otherwise provide.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1337, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-123. Sale of special obligation bonds.

Any special obligation bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be sold at public or private sale for not less than the principal amount thereof and accrued interest, or at the option of the board, below par, at a discount not exceeding seven percent of the principal amount thereof, but such special obligation bonds shall never be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate authorized.

No discount, except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, or commission shall be allowed or paid on or for any sale to any purchaser or bidder, directly or indirectly.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1337, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-124. Contracts.

The board shall award contracts in excess of three thousand dollars on a fair and competitive basis for the construction of any works, facility, or project, or portion thereof, or for the performance or furnishing of any labor, material, personal or real property, services, or supplies.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1338, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1524, § 14, effective April 16.

32-14-125. Management agreement - operation of stadium.

Upon the approval of the registered electors pursuant to the provisions of section 32-14-105 and upon the granting of a major league baseball franchise by major league baseball to be located within the district, the board shall negotiate and enter into one or more management agreements for the management and operation of the stadium with independent contractors upon such terms and conditions which the board deems reasonable and necessary. Such agreements shall be legally binding contracts between the district and professional management organizations which shall contain appropriate and reasonable provisions with respect to termination, default, and legal remedies. For purposes of this section, "professional management organization" means a person, firm, or corporation having experience, expertise, and specialization in the management and operation of sports, entertainment, or convention facilities, or in a particular area therein.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1338, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1524, § 15, effective April 16.

32-14-126. Lease of stadium - major league baseball franchise.

Any lease agreement entered into by the district and the major league baseball franchise to be located in the district shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

A provision requiring the major league baseball franchise to conduct its complete regular home season schedule and any home play-off events in the stadium;

A provision requiring the major league baseball franchise to advertise and promote events it conducts at the stadium; and

A provision requiring the major league baseball franchise to not unreasonably withhold permission for the holding of other events in the stadium.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1338, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-126.5. Revenue sharing.

After all the principal, interest, and premium, if any, of the special obligation bonds issued pursuant to this article are paid in full and the levy and collection of sales tax revenues by the district is discontinued, but prior to the repeal of this article, any funds collected by the district which are, in the sole discretion of the board, deemed not to be necessary for the anticipated expenses and reserves of the district shall be credited at least annually to the general fund of each county, city and county, city, and town which is included, in whole or in part, in the district based upon the proportion of the total amount of sales tax revenues collected pursuant to section 32-14-114 within such county, city and county, city, and town to the total amount of sales tax revenues collected pursuant to section 32-14-114 within the district. For purposes of this section, the total amount of sales tax revenues collected within a county shall not include any sales tax revenues collected in any city or town located within such county. In addition, in computing said proportion, any sales tax revenues collected in any county, city, or town which is not included, in whole or in part, within the geographical boundaries of the district shall not be included in the total amount of sales tax revenues collected within the district.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1525, § 16, effective April 16.

32-14-127. Report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1338, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 867, § 5, effective August 7.

32-14-128. Limitations upon liabilities.

Neither the directors nor any person executing any obligations issued pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be personally liable on the obligations by reason of the issuance thereof. Obligations issued pursuant to this article shall not in any way create or constitute any indebtedness, liability, or obligation of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, except the district, and nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the district to incur any indebtedness on behalf of or in any way to obligate the state or any political subdivision thereof, except the district, and nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the district to incur any indebtedness on behalf of or in any way to obligate the state or any political subdivision thereof, except as specifically provided in this article.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1338, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-129. Sale of real and personal property of district.

Upon completion of the construction of a stadium pursuant to the provisions of this article, the board shall make a good faith effort to sell the real and personal property of the district, including the stadium, to any qualified buyer. The board shall establish criteria to determine qualified buyers. The board shall not accept any offer from any qualified buyer for such real and personal property of the district for an amount less than the total amount of outstanding obligations of the district or the amount of sales tax revenues used by the board to acquire a site for a stadium and to construct a stadium, whichever is greater.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1339, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-130. Limitations upon promotional activities.

No moneys of the district shall be used for promotion of the acquisition of a major league baseball franchise or for the passage of a sales tax increase for the construction of a stadium within the district.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1339, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-131. Colorado baseball commission - creation - membership.

There is hereby created the Colorado baseball commission which shall consist of no fewer than fifteen commissioners but no more than eighteen commissioners. The commission shall be a body corporate and a political subdivision of the state, shall not be an agency of state government, and shall not be subject to administrative direction by any department, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state. Initial appointments to the commission shall be made within ninety days after June 2, 1989.

Repealed.

Five commissioners shall be appointed by the governor.

Two commissioners shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

Two commissioners shall be appointed by the president of the senate.

Six commissioners shall be appointed as follows:

One commissioner each shall be appointed by the boards of county commissioners of the five counties in the district; and

One commissioner shall be appointed by the city and county of Denver.

The remaining commissioners, if any, shall be appointed by the governor.

All commissioners appointed pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of this section shall reside within the geographical boundaries of the district.

Any appointed commissioner may be removed at any time at the pleasure of the person or governing body who appointed such commissioner. If any appointed commissioner vacates his office, a vacancy on the commission shall exist, and the person or governing body who appointed such commissioner vacating his office shall fill such vacancy by appointment.

The appointed commissioners shall elect such officers as deemed necessary and appropriate from among the appointed membership of the commission.

Commissioners shall receive no compensation for their services but may be reimbursed for their necessary expenses while serving as commissioners.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1339, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 90:

(1), (3)(a), and (6) amended, (2) repealed, and (3)(e) added, pp. 1525, 1526, §§ 17, 18, effective April 16.

32-14-132. Commission - powers and duties.

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To advise and make recommendations to the board concerning the performance of the duties of the board as set forth in this article;

To promote the sport of baseball in the state of Colorado, including but not limited to the acquisition of a major league baseball franchise and the construction of a stadium within the district;

To formulate and adopt an annual budget to govern the expenses of the commission in undertaking its activities;

To adopt, and from time to time amend or repeal, such bylaws and rules and regulations as it may consider to be necessary or advisable and to keep a record of its proceedings, which record shall be open to inspection by the public at all reasonable times;

To contract for those services, including services for necessary personnel, and materials required by the activities of the commission;

To administer and use moneys received by the commission in accordance with the provisions of this section;

To receive and expend donations or grants from any private source or from any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States government to be held, used, and applied to carry out the purposes of this section subject to the conditions upon which the donations or grants are made; however, nothing in this paragraph (g) shall authorize the commission to accept or expend public moneys, whether as gifts, grants, or other forms of contribution, from the state, the board, any city, town, city and county, or county;

To deposit any moneys received by the commission pursuant to the provisions of this section in any banking institution within the state or in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., and to appoint, for purposes of making such deposits, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the commission, who may be required to give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board may require; and

To develop reporting and review requirements governing the receipt and expenditures of any moneys received by the commission pursuant to the provisions of this section. The account of all moneys received by and expended by the commission shall be a public record and shall be open for inspection by the public at all reasonable times.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1340, § 1, effective June 2.

32-14-133. Repeal of article.

This article is repealed, effective as of the earliest occurrence of the following:

Five years after July 1, 1989, if the board has not submitted the question set forth in section 32-14-105 (1) to the registered electors within the geographic boundaries of the district pursuant to the provisions of said section; or

At such time as a majority of the registered electors within the geographical boundaries of the district vote negatively on the question set forth in section 32-14-105 (1); or

Ten years after July 1, 1989, if major league baseball has not granted a major league baseball franchise to be located within the geographical boundaries of the district to any individual, group of individuals, or entity; or

The completion of the sale of the stadium by the board to any qualified buyer pursuant to the provisions of section 32-14-129.

Upon repeal of this article, any funds collected by the district but not used for the purposes set forth in this article shall be credited to the general fund of each county, city and county, city, and town which is included, in whole or in part, in the district based upon the proportion of the total amount of sales tax revenues collected pursuant to section 32-14-114 within such county, city and county, city, and town to the total amount of sales tax revenues collected pursuant to section 32-14-114 within the district. For purposes of this subsection (2), the total amount of sales tax revenues collected within a county shall not include any sales tax revenues collected in any city or town located within such county. In addition, in computing said proportion, any sales tax revenues collected in any county, city, or town which is not included, in whole or in part, within the geographical boundaries of the district shall not be included in the total amount of sales tax revenues collected within the district.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1341, § 1, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

This article remains in effect since the question of authorizing the district to levy and collect a sales tax was approved on August 14, 1990, by a majority of the registered electors, a major league franchise was granted on July 5, 1991, and the sale of the stadium by the board has not taken place.